Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,140
Certain mobile homes and modular housing units; exemption.

Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146, mobile homes constructed after September 27, 1975, and modular housing units constructed pursuant to sections 71-1555 to 71-1567 after January 10, 1977, shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 9;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 28.